Utah statutes.
76-9-304.   Allowing vicious animal to go at large.
Any owner of a vicious animal, knowing its propensities, who willfully allows
it to go at large or who keeps it without ordinary care, and any animal, while
at large, or while not kept with ordinary care, causes injury to another
animal or to any human being who has taken reasonable precaution which the
circumstances permitted, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor unless the animal
causes the death of a human being, whereupon the owner is guilty of a felony
of the third degree.
